California, session 20252026, SB1286.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 425.4 is added to the Government Code, to read:425.4. (a) The California State Library shall conduct a study, in consultation with the public, on the best candidate for the official state pinniped.(b) (1) On or before January 1, 2028, the California State Library shall submit a report to the Legislature with the California State Library’s recommendations based on the study conducted pursuant to subdivision (a).(2) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.(c) This section shall be repealed on January 1, 2032, pursuant to Section 10231.5.SECTION 1.The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a)Pinnipeds are fin- or flipper-footed marine mammals that have front and rear flippers; the California sea lion is a member of the “eared seal” family.(b)California sea lions are found along the shore from California to Mexico, including Baja and Tres Marias Islands, in the Galapagos Islands, and in the southern Sea of Japan. They generally live along coastlines but have been found in rivers along the northern Pacific coast. California sea lions often congregate on man-made structures such as jetties, piers, offshore buoys, and oil platforms.(c)California sea lions have been known to assemble at the mouths of freshwater rivers where there is a steady supply of fish. They also feed on cephalopods, anchovies, herring, Pacific whiting, rockfish, hake, salmon, squid, and octopuses.(d)The California sea lion, once in severe decline, has rebounded and is abundant today because of the federal Marine Mammal Protection Act of 1972 (Public Law 92-522).(e)It is the intent of the Legislature that this recognition helps provide additional protections as California sea lions face a rapidly changing environment.SEC. 2.Section 425.4 is added to the Government Code, to read:425.4.The California sea lion (Zalophus californianus) is the official state pinniped.